test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_ishkodewidaabaan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
